en: Cooked pork meat
fr: Viande de porc cuite
hr: Kuhano svinjsko meso
lt: Kepta kiaulienos mėsa

en: Smoked cooked pork meat
fr: Viande de porc cuite fumée

en: Rolled escalope of pork with pistachios
fr: Roulade de porc pistachée

en: Assortments of meat roulades, Assortment of meat roulades
fr: Assortiments de roulades, Assortiment de roulades

fr: Paupiettes
nl: Slavinken

en: Pork skewers, Pork on skewer
de: Schweinespieße
fr: Brochettes de porc, brochette de porc
hr: Svinjski ražnjići
lt: Kiaulienos iešmeliai, Kiauliena ant iešmo
nl: Varkensspiesjes

en: Cooked pork racks
fr: Carrés de porc cuits

en: Pork spare-ribs
fr: Travers de porc
hr: Svinjska rebra
ja: 豚のスペアリブ

en: Braised pork spare-ribs
fr: Travers de porc braisés

en: Cooked pork loin
fr: Longe de porc cuite
hr: Kuhani lungić
ja: 調理した豚ロース

en: Pork tenderloin
de: Schweinefilet
fr: Filet maigre de porc
hr: Svinjski file
ja: 豚ヒレ肉

en: Cooked pork tenderloin roast
fr: Filet maigre de porc en rôti cuit

en: Cooked pork round steak
fr: Rouelle de jambon cuite, Rouelle de jambon de porc cuite

en: Cooked pork filet mignon
fr: Filet mignon de porc cuit

en: Salt-cured pork trotters
fr: Pied de porc demi-sel

en: Pork jowl
fr: Gorges de porc

en: Rindless pork jowl
fr: Gorge de porc découennée

en: Frozen pork jowl
fr: Gorges de porc surgelées

en: Pork liver
fr: Foie de porc
hr: Svinjska jetra
ja: 豚レバー

en: Cooked pork liver
fr: Foie de porc cuit